src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS
+Pl+Acc: # ;
+Pl+Gen:ˮ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:%^PLNOM%>н° # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Acc+PxSg1:%^PLNOM%>н° # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:%>ˮн° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:%^PLNOM%>д° # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Acc+PxSg2:%^PLNOM%>д° # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:%>т° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:%^PLNOM%>д%{ая%} # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Acc+PxSg3:%^PLNOM%>д%{ая%} # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:%>т%{ая%} # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg:%^PLNOM%>ни # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg:%^PLNOM%>ни # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg:%>ˮни # ;

+Pl+Nom+PxDu1:%^PLNOM%>ниʼ # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Acc+PxDu1:%^PLNOM%>ниʼ # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Gen+PxDu1:%>ˮниʼ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu2:%^PLNOM%>диʼ # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Acc+PxDu2:%^PLNOM%>диʼ # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Gen+PxDu2:%>тиʼ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu3:%^PLNOM%>диʼ # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Acc+PxDu3:%^PLNOM%>диʼ # ; ! no i2e
+Pl+Gen+PxDu3:%>тиʼ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:%^PLNOM%>наˮ # ;
+Pl+Acc+PxPl1:%^PLNOM%>наˮ # ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:%>ˮнаˮ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%^PLNOM%>даˮ # ;
+Pl+Acc+PxPl2:%^PLNOM%>даˮ # ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:%>таˮ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:%^PLNOM%>д%{оё%}ʼ # ;
+Pl+Acc+PxPl3:%^PLNOM%>д%{оё%}ʼ # ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:%>т%{оё%}ʼ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>н° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>д° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>д%{ая%} # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>ниʼ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>диʼ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>диʼ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>наˮ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>даˮ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>д%{оё%}ʼ # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>нась° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>дась° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>д%{ая%}сь° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>нинзь° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>динзь° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>динзь° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>наць° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>даць° # ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%^PLNOM%>д%{оё%}нзь° # ;

LEXICON PLPROSPXSUF
+Pl+Pros:%>ˮм°н%{ая%} # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxSg1:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}н° # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}ни # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxSg2:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}т° # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxSg3:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}та # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu1:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}ниʼ # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu2:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}тиʼ # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxDu3:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}тиʼ # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl1:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}наˮ # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl2:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}таˮ # ;
+Pl+Pros+PxPl3:%>ˮм°н%{ая%}тоʼ # ;


LEXICON N_ИЛЪЕ-Pal/Var
: NMN_ИЛЪЕ ;

LEXICON NMN_ИЛЪЕ
:%>а%{йнңъʼØ%} SGDATSUF ;
:%{йнңъʼØ%} SG-ACC-STEM ;
!:а%{йнңъʼØ%} SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%{йнңъʼØ%} SGNOMSUF ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
:%{йнңъʼØ%} SG-NOM-STEM ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
:%{йнңъʼØ%} SGPROSSUF ;
:а PLNOMSUF ;
:ъ PLACCSUF_Е ;
:%{йнңъʼØ%}  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:%{йнңъʼØ%} POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var !! Where is the variation?
: NMN_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON NMN_ТАРЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня
:%{дˮØ%} SGDATSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} SG-ACC-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} SGPROSSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} SGLOCSUF_Хна ; 
:%{дˮØ%} SGLOCSUF_Хана ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLNOMSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLACCSUF_Е ;



!: NMN_МЯДО ;
!+Lim:ˮли NMN_ҢЭ ;

LEXICON N_ВАР/МЯДО
 N_МЯДО ;

LEXICON N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
!  тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня
    N_МЯДО ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLACCSUF_Е ;

LEXICON NMN_ВАР  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
!! Yaml: __waro__
:%{дˮØ%} SGDATSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} SG-ACC-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} SGLOCSUF_Хна ; 
:%{дˮØ%} SGLOCSUF_Хана ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_О ;
:%{дˮØ%}  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:%{дˮØ%} POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_МЯДО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
!! Yaml: __myado__
:%{дˮØ%} SGDATSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} SG-ACC-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} SGLOCSUF_Хна ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мякна
:%{дˮØ%} SGPROSSUF ;
!:%{дˮØ%} SGPROSSUF_АМНА ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLNOMSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLACCSUF_О ;
:%{дˮØ%}  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:%{дˮØ%} POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ИДЕ-Pal/Var !! Where is the variation?
: NMN_ИДЕ ;

LEXICON NMN_ИДЕ !! Where is the variation?
:%{дˮØ%} SGDATSUF ;
:аС1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
:аС1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLNOMSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLACCSUF_Е ;
:%{дˮØ%}  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:%{дˮØ%} POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ИДЕ/МЯДО
 N_ИДЕ ;
 N_МЯДО ;
 
LEXICON N_ТЮСЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ тюˮ:тюсе 
: NMN_ТЮСЕ ;

LEXICON NMN_ТЮСЕ
:С1 SGDATSUF ;
:С1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
:С1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
:С1 PLNOMSUF ;
:с PLACCSUF_Е ;
:С1 POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
:С1 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ТАСО/ТЮСЕ
 N_ТАСО ;
 N_ТЮСЕ ;

LEXICON N_ҢАВО 
: NMN_ҢАВО ;

LEXICON NMN_ҢАВО !!Provisional solution
:мгэ SGDATSUF ;
:мгэ SG-ACC-STEM ;
:мгэ SG-NOM-STEM ;
:мгэ SGPROSSUF ;
:мгэ PLNOMSUF ;
:в PLACCSUF_О ; 
:мгэ POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
:мгэ POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_Vow
+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON N_ЕСЯ  >> N_ҢОДИ/ПИСЬ = 
!: NMN_Vow ;

LEXICON	    N_САВНЕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON	    N_СЁ  >> N_ҢЭ/СЁЁ/ХАБИЕ=
!: NMN_Vow ;

!LEXICON	    N_ҢЭСЫ  >> N_ҢЭ ңэсы:ңэсы
!: NMN_Vow ;

!LEXICON	    N_ЯКЭ  >> N_ЯКЫ
!: NMN_Vow ;

LEXICON	    N_ПЕНЗЕРЕ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ пензерˮ:пензер
 N_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON	N_САБЦЬ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ сабць:сабць
 N_ТИРЕ ;

LEXICON N_МЕРЁ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мерё:мерё
 N_ҢАНУ ;


!! NMN
LEXICON NMN_ТИРЕ/ХАНО
 SGDATSUF ;
:а  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; 


LEXICON NMN_ҢЭ-OLD !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ңэ:ңэ 1  ProsSg -вна
 PL-PROS-ALL ;
 PL-GEN-PXSG1 ;
  SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ SGACCSUF, SGGENSUF
  SG-NOM-STEM ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ SG/DAT,LOC, ABL,TRA,PRO; DU/NOM,ACC,GEN; PL/DAT,LOC,ABL,TRA; PX-s, NOMINAL-CONJUGATION
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ => PL-ACC_STEM
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;


LEXICON NMN_ҢЭ/Ё
  SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !!
:%^A2O PLACCSUF_Zero ; 

LEXICON NMN_ҢЭ/СЁЁ/ХАБИЕ
 SGDATSUF ;
 SG-ACC-STEM ;
 SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLACCSUF_Ё ; !
 PLACCSUF_Е ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL_ХАЮН ;


LEXICON NMN_ПАНЫ !! 9
:%^VowLower SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
:%^VowLower SG-NOM-STEM ;
  SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
:%^VowLower  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:%^VowLower POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хусувэй: 10 ProsSg -ювна
  SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ЕД/ХАНО
:а SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%>у SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  PLACCSUF_О ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
!:%>о  POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ
 SGDATSUF ;
:%^JLoss SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !

LEXICON NMN_ХАНО-OLD !!= * @CODE@ 11 хан:хан
	NMN_ХАНО-SG ;
	NMN_ХАНО-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_ХАНО-SG
:а SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%>у SGPROSSUF ;

LEXICON NMN_ХАНО-PL
  PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_О ; !
 POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;


LEXICON NMN_ТИРЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ тир: 12 ProsSg -увна
SGDATSUF ;
:а  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%>у SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Е ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ЕД  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ед: 13 ProsSg -увна /-ювна
!! Yaml: __yed__
:а  SGDATSUF ;
    SG-ACC-STEM ;
    SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%>у SGPROSSUF ;
    PLNOMSUF ;
    PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL_ХАЮН ;

!! !!NOMINALS "NMN"
!! !THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS
LEXICON    NMN_МАРАҢГЫ
    NMN_МАРАҢГЫ-SG ;
    NMN_МАРАҢГЫ-PL ;
