src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
вадисей+N:вадисей N_САБЦЬ  "vasuri" ;
варе+N:варе N_САВНЕ  "ponnistus" ;
варкадё+N:варкадё N_МЕРЁ  "karhunnahkoilla koristetut poronvaljaat" ;
выврё+N:выврё N_МЕРЁ  "vihellys" ;
выңоцё+N:выңоцё N_МЕРЁ  "aho" ;
ендˮ+N:енд N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "virta" ;
ендё+N:ендё N_МЕРЁ  "pingottunut esine" ;
есерˮ+N:есер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "uudin" ;
идецё+N:идецё N_МЕРЁ  "vesi (deminutiivi)" ;
идрё+N:идрю N_МЕРЁ  "piipitys" ;
идъе+N:идъе N_САВНЕ  "väre" ;
иларˮ+N:илар N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "harhanäky" ;
илерˮ+N:илер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "elämä" ;
илирˮ+N:илир N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "elämäntapa" ;
индˮ+N:инд N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "henkäys" ;
ирнё+N:ирнё N_МЕРЁ  "kitinä" ;
лабрё+N:лабрё N_МЕРЁ  "kahina" ;
лакадё+N:лакадё N_МЕРЁ  "näpsäys" ;
лахарё+N:лахарё N_МЕРЁ  "keskustelu" ;
лекарцо+N:лекарцё N_МЕРЁ  "lääke" ;
либтˮ+N:либт N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "turkissukka" ;
лэмбарё+N:лэмбарё N_МЕРЁ  "perhonen" ;
лэё+N:лэё N_МЕРЁ  "liekki" ;
маларё+N:маларё N_МЕРЁ  "puheen sorina" ;
марˮ+N:мар N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "rauhanen" ;
марˮ+N:мар N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "urosvilliporo" ;
маркадё+N:маркадё N_МЕРЁ  "ratina" ;
мирˮ+N:мир N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "tavara" ;
мирˮ+N:мир N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "hahmo" ;
морё+N:морё N_МЕРЁ  "paahde" ;
мярё+N:мярё N_МЕРЁ  "säämiskä" ;
нарё+N:нарё N_МЕРЁ  "karjunta" ;
нерˮ+N:нер N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "rusto" ;
нерˮ+N:нер N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "valkuainen" ;
нойдё+N:нойдё N_МЕРЁ  "punaisella verkalla koristettu naisten reki" ;
нюе+N:нюе N_САВНЕ  "lapsiparka" ;
нюмдерˮ+N:нюмдер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "nimitys" ;
няврё+N:няврё N_МЕРЁ  "hörökorvainen valkoinen koira" ;
падё+N:падё N_МЕРЁ  "auringon asento horisontin lähellä" ;
паё+N:паё N_МЕРЁ  "leppä" ;
педˮ+N:пед N_ТАСО/ТЮСЕ  "etusarvi" ;
педерˮ+N:педер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "hupun reuna" ;
пилё+N:пилё N_МЕРЁ  "paarma" ;
пуˮлё+N:пуˮлё N_МЕРЁ  "matalalla kulkeva pilvi" ;
пыдё+N:пыдё N_МЕРЁ  "tihkusade" ;
пырдё+N:пырдё N_МЕРЁ  "vastakarvaan suunta" ;
пэвдё+N:пэвдё N_МЕРЁ  "halko" ;
пэвсюмдё+N:пэвсюмдё N_МЕРЁ  "ilta" ;
пюсё+N:пюсё N_МЕРЁ  "halkeama" ;
сабць+N:сабць N_САБЦЬ  "sylki" ;
савне+N:савне N_САВНЕ  "harakka" ;
сарё+N:сарё N_МЕРЁ  "sade" ;
сеʼ+N:се N_ИЛЪЕ-Pal/Var  "tuppi" ;
сеˮ+N:се N_ИДЕ-Pal/Var  "pihka" ;
седˮ+N:сед N_ТАСО/ТЮСЕ  "poronnahasta pieni peite jolla kapaloidaan lasta" ;
сейрё+N:сейрё N_МЕРЁ  "kalina" ;
сесарё+N:сесрё N_МЕРЁ  "kahina" ;
сидерˮ+N:сидер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "ikkuna" ;
синдё+N:синдё N_МЕРЁ  "hetki, jolloin kovasti nukuttaa" ;
сисё+N:сисё N_МЕРЁ  "vaahto" ;
сыңгрё+N:сыңгрё N_МЕРЁ  "huhu" ;
сюдрё+N:сюдрё N_МЕРЁ  "vihellys" ;
сянзё+N:сянзё N_МЕРЁ  "sulatettu rasva poron luista ja sisälmyksistä" ;
сяркадё+N:сяркадё N_МЕРЁ  "vingahdus" ;
сяртё+N:сяртё N_МЕРЁ  "lapsi joka ei päästä äitiään luota" ;
сяхарё+N:сяхарё N_МЕРЁ  "kalke" ;
танзё+N:танзё N_МЕРЁ  "mustelma" ;
танё+N:танё N_МЕРЁ  "järveen laskeva joki" ;
тасьрю+N:тасьрю N_МЕРЁ  "ähinä" ;
тобрё+N:тобрё N_МЕРЁ  "kopina" ;
тоёцё+N:тоёцё N_МЕРЁ  "huopa" ;
тыдрё+N:тыдрё N_МЕРЁ  "natina" ;
тюˮ+N:тю N_ТЮСЕ  "merkkipylväs" ;
хаˮмаре+N:хаˮмаре N_САВНЕ  "huuhkaja" ;
хаˮмаре+N:хаˮмире N_САВНЕ  "huuhkaja" ;
хаˮнё+N:хаˮнё N_МЕРЁ  "kova nauru" ;
хадё+N:хадё N_МЕРЁ  "vahinko" ;
хаерˮ+N:хаер N_ВАР/МЯДО  "aurinko" ;
хаерˮ+N:хаяр N_ВАР/МЯДО  "aurinko" ;
хамзедё+N:хамзедё N_МЕРЁ  "jylinä" ;
ханьˮ+N:хань N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "yöhalla" ;
ханьзяре+N:ханьзяре N_САВНЕ  "vanne" ;
ханьрё+N:ханьрё N_МЕРЁ  "kova nauru" ;
харё+N:харё N_МЕРЁ  "kurki" ;
хасё+N:хасё N_МЕРЁ  "mies" ;
хаце+N:хаце N_САВНЕ  "häkä" ;
хаңгарё+N:хаңгарё N_МЕРЁ  "tulen kahina" ;
хоркадё+N:хоркадё N_МЕРЁ  "kolo" ;
хулкадё+N:хулкадё N_МЕРЁ  "hörppiminen" ;
хыберё+N:хыберё N_МЕРЁ  "koiran vikinä" ;
хынё+N:хынё N_МЕРЁ  "epätyytyväisyys" ;
хыртё+N:хыртё N_МЕРЁ  "viileys" ;
хэрлё+N:хэрлё N_МЕРЁ  "leikkirengas" ;
юдерˮ+N:юдер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "lämpö" ;
юрё+N:юрё N_МЕРЁ  "ystävä" ;
ялрё+N:ялрё N_МЕРЁ  "jylinä" ;
ялё+N:ялё N_МЕРЁ  "vapina" ;
ямдё+N:ямдё N_МЕРЁ  "nahasta tai säämiskästä koriste poronvaljakolla" ;
яндˮ+N:янд N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "vuori" ;
ясацё+N:ясацё N_МЕРЁ  "kekäle" ;
ёрˮ+N:ёр N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "hauskutus" ;
ңаˮнё+N:ңаˮнё N_МЕРЁ  "melu" ;
ңасрё+N:ңасрё N_МЕРЁ  "hiljainen ontto ääni" ;
ңэдрё+N:ңэдрё N_МЕРЁ  "nouseva ja laskeva ääni" ;
